Washington statutes.
RCW 9.24.040

Corporation doing business without license.

Every corporation, whether domestic or foreign, and every person representing or pretending to represent such corporation as an officer, agent or employee thereof, who shall transact, solicit or advertise for any business in this state, before such corporation shall have obtained from the officer lawfully authorized to issue the same, a certificate that such corporation is authorized to transact business in this state, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1909 c 249 s 389; RRS s 2641. Formerly RCW 9.45.130.]

NOTES:

Application to mutual savings banks: RCW 32.04.120.